Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201919-3305
Proceedings, taxes or assessments levied, bonds issued; validity.

Any proceedings taken, taxes or assessments levied, or bonds issued pursuant to the Offstreet Parking District Act shall not be held invalid for failure to comply with the act.

Laws 1967, c. 60, § 5, p. 200;

R.S.Supp.,1967, § 16-816;

Laws 1969, c. 88, § 5, p. 439;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 183.
September 1, 2019